Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3252 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
require all academic programs be reviewed by faculty on a five-year
cycle to ensure quality and currency of each program's content. If
a program is classified as a low-producing program, the

classification shall trigger an early review by the Oklahoma State
Board of Regents for Higher Education.
B. A "low-producing program" means a program that does not meet
the following minimum standards during a five-year average for the
degree plan:
1. Associate in Arts or Sciences has:
a. less than five degrees conferred, or
b. less than twenty-five majors enrolled;
2. Associate in Applied Science has:
a. less than five degrees conferred, or
b. less than seventeen majors enrolled;
3. Baccalaureate has:
a. less than five degrees conferred, or
b. less than twelve majors enrolled;
4. Masters has:
a. less than three degrees conferred, or
b. less than six majors enrolled; and
5. Doctoral has:
a. less than two degrees conferred, or
b. less than four majors enrolled.
C. The State Board of Regents shall conduct an annual review of
low-producing programs for each of its member colleges and
universities.
D. Low-producing programs shall be reviewed by the State Board
of Regents for deletion, suspension, or continuation. Programs may
qualify for continuation if the programs qualify under one of the
following exceptions:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3701 Page 2

1. No cost – The program has no cost to the university;
2. Shared cost – The program shares costs and resources with
other non-low-producing programs or receives support from external,
non-state funding sources;
3. Restructured programs – The program was recently reinstated
after suspension for significant curriculum modifications aimed at
enhancing productivity;
4. Collaborative programs – The program is currently offered in
collaboration with other institutions or the institution intends to
pursue collaborative opportunities; or
5. Grow the program – The program has an established or
developing strategic plan specifically designed to achieve minimum
productivity standards.
E. Programs identified as low-producing and granted an
exemption to continue shall be placed on probationary status for
three (3) years. Programs placed on probationary status shall
submit a plan of improvement to the State Board of Regents for
approval. Failure to meet or demonstrate progress towards minimum
productivity standards as noted in the plan of improvement within
the three-year period shall lead to action by the State Board of
Regents to delete or suspend the program. Programs selected for
suspension shall complete the process within one (1) academic year.
Programs selected for deletion have one (1) academic year to develop
a teach-out plan and submit the required documentation.
F. Upon completion of the probationary period, programs shall
be reviewed by the State Board of Regents the year following the
conclusion of the probationary period.
G. Any program that is classified as a low-producing program
shall receive no more than two exemptions from paragraphs 2 through
5 of subsection D of this section in a consecutive ten-year period
and shall be scheduled for deletion upon being classified an
additional time as a low-producing program within the ten-year
period.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
ENR. H. B. NO. 3701 Page 3

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3701 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 10th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3701 Page 5